Hawaii statutes.
§291-34 Size of vehicles; width,
height, and length. (a) Width. No motor vehicle or other power vehicle
having an overall width greater than nine feet, including load, shall be
operated or moved upon any public road, street, or highway within the State,
except as hereinafter provided.

(b) Height. No motor vehicle or other power
vehicle having an overall height greater than fourteen feet, including load,
shall be operated or moved upon any public road, street, or highway within the
State except as hereinafter provided; and provided further that no motor
vehicle or other power vehicle shall be operated under or through any bridge or
other highway structure if the height of the motor vehicle or other power
vehicle exceeds the posted height for the bridge or other highway structure.

(c) Length:

(1) No single motor vehicle or other power vehicle
having a total overall length greater than forty-five feet, including load,
shall be operated or moved upon any public road, street, or highway within the
State, except as provided in this subsection;

(2) No truck-tractor and semitrailer having a total
overall length greater than sixty-five feet, including load, shall be operated
or moved upon any public road, street, or highway, other than interstate
highways and certain qualifying federal aid highways as designated by the
director of transportation, within the State, except as provided in this
subsection; provided that:

(A) For truck-tractors and semitrailers used
for agricultural purposes and public utilities maintenance and service
vehicles, the total combined length of the truck-tractor and semitrailer or
public utility maintenance and service vehicle shall not exceed sixty-five feet
in length;

(B) The length of the semitrailer shall not
exceed forty-eight feet in length; and

(C) The length of an articulated bus for
public transit purposes shall not exceed eighty-two feet in length, and shall
not consist of more than three units;

(3) No combination of motor vehicles or other power
vehicles coupled together shall consist of more than two units and no
combination of vehicles having a total overall length greater than sixty-five
feet, including load, shall be operated or moved upon any public road, street,
or highway other than interstate highways and certain qualifying federal aid
highways as designated by the director of transportation, within the State,
except as provided in this subsection. A truck-tractor and semitrailer shall
be regarded as a single unit when determining the number of units in a combination;

(4) No motor vehicle, self-propelled construction or
farm equipment, trailer, or semitrailer shall be operated upon any public road,
street, or highway within the State if it is carrying or otherwise has
projecting to the front or rear, a load, boom, mast, or other projecting
structure or attachment unless:

(A) With respect to self-propelled
construction or farm equipment:

(i) The length of the equipment measured on a
horizontal axis, including the projection, is not greater than forty-five feet;

(ii) The projection is either held securely in
place or is controlled by the driver or an operator;

(iii) The projection does not obstruct the
driver's vision;

(iv) The projection does not impair the
driver's ability to control the equipment;

(v) The projection beyond the front tires is
at least seven feet above the roadway surface; and

(vi) The projection does not extend more than
four feet past the extremity of the piece of equipment, or if it extends more
than four feet, an escort vehicle is provided by the owner or operator either
to the front or to the rear of the projection to call attention to the
projection; or

(B) With respect to a motor vehicle, or a
motor vehicle with attached trailer or semitrailer:

(i) The overall length of a motor vehicle
including the projection, is not greater than forty-five feet or the overall
length of the motor vehicle with attached trailer or semitrailer, including the
projection, is not greater than sixty feet except that this limitation on a motor
vehicle with attached trailer or semitrailer, including the projection, shall
not be applicable on interstate highways and certain qualifying federal aid
highways, as designated by the director of transportation;

(ii) The projection is either held securely in
place or is controlled by the driver or an operator;

(iii) The projection does not obstruct the
driver's vision;

(iv) The projection does not impair the
driver's ability to control the equipment;

(v) The projection beyond the front tires is
at least seven feet above the roadway surface; and

(vi) The projection does not extend more than
four feet past the extremity of the trailer or semitrailer, or, if it extends
more than four feet, an escort vehicle is provided by the owner or operator
either to the front or to the rear of the projection to call attention to the
projection;

(5) The limitations in this subsection upon length
shall not apply to vehicles transporting pipe, poles, timbers, reinforcing
steel, structural steel, or other objects of a structural nature that cannot be
readily dismembered; provided that when transported by night every vehicle
shall be equipped with a sufficient number of clearance lamps upon the extreme
ends of any projecting load to clearly mark the dimensions of the load. [L
1941, c 216, pt of §1; RL 1945, §11713; RL 1955, §311-19; HRS §291-34; am L
1969, c 37, §1; am L 1971, c 133, §1; am L 1978, c 32, §1; am L 1980, c 76, §1;
am L 1981, c 61, §1; am L 1983, c 188, §1; am L 1991, c 26, §1; am L 1994, c
28, §1; am L 1995, c 115, §1; am L 1999, c 184, §1; am L 2009, c 83, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next